Illinois, session 104th, SB1311.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1030 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)7    Sec. 5.1030. The Aquatic Habitat Conservation Fund. 8    Section 10. The Fish and Aquatic Life Code is amended by 9changing Sections 1-230, 20-20, 20-30, 20-45, 20-55, 20-110, 10and 20-115 and by adding Sections 1-92, 20-12, and 20-52 as 11follows: 12    (515 ILCS 5/1-92 new)13    Sec. 1-92. Aquatic habitat conservation stamp. "Aquatic 14habitat conservation stamp" means a special stamp issued by 15the Department (i) for the management, restoration, and 16protection of aquatic and riparian habitats in Illinois, (ii) 17for elimination of or protection from aquatic nuisance 18species, and (iii) for preparation for and protection from the 19effects of climate change in Illinois, including increased 20risks of flooding, erosion, and sedimentation.   SB1311- 2 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1    (515 ILCS 5/1-230)  (from Ch. 56, par. 1-230)2    Sec. 1-230. Wildlife and Fish Fund; other Funds; 3disposition of money received. All fees, fines, income of 4whatever kind or nature derived from hunting and fishing 5activities on lands, waters, or both under the jurisdiction or 6control of the Department, and all penalties collected under 7this Code shall be deposited into the State Treasury and shall 8be set apart in a special fund to be known as the Wildlife and 9Fish Fund; except that fees derived solely from the sale of 10salmon stamps, income from art contests for the salmon stamp, 11including income from the sale of reprints, and gifts, 12donations, grants, and bequests of money for the conservation 13and propagation of salmon shall be deposited into the State 14Treasury and set apart in the special fund to be known as the 15Salmon Fund; except that fees derived solely from the sale of 16aquatic habitat conservation stamps shall be deposited into 17the State Treasury and set apart in the special fund to be 18known as the Aquatic Habitat Conservation Fund; and except 19that fees derived solely from the sale of state migratory 20waterfowl stamps, and gifts, donations, grants and bequests of 21money for the conservation and propagation of waterfowl, shall 22be deposited into the State Treasury and set apart in the 23special fund to be known as the State Migratory Waterfowl 24Stamp Fund. All interest that accrues from moneys in the 25Wildlife and Fish Fund, the Salmon Fund, the Aquatic Habitat 26Conservation Fund, and the State Migratory Waterfowl Stamp   SB1311- 3 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1Fund shall be retained in those funds respectively. Except for 2the additional moneys deposited under Section 805-550 of the 3Department of Natural Resources (Conservation) Law of the 4Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, appropriations from the 5Wildlife and Fish Fund shall be made only to the Department for 6the carrying out of the powers and functions vested by law in 7the Department for the administration and management of fish 8and wildlife resources of this State for such activities as 9(i) the purchase of land for fish hatcheries, wildlife 10refuges, preserves, and public shooting and fishing grounds; 11(ii) the purchase and distribution of wild birds, the eggs of 12wild birds, and wild mammals; (iii) the rescuing, restoring 13and distributing of fish; (iv) the maintenance of wildlife 14refuges or preserves, public shooting grounds, public fishing 15grounds, and fish hatcheries; and (v) the feeding and care of 16wild birds, wild mammals, and fish. Appropriations from the 17Salmon Fund shall be made only to the Department to be used 18solely for the conservation and propagation of salmon, 19including construction, operation, and maintenance of a cold 20water hatchery, and for payment of the costs of printing 21salmon stamps, the expenses incurred in acquiring salmon stamp 22designs, and the expenses of producing reprints. 23Appropriations from the Aquatic Habitat Conservation Fund 24shall be made solely to the Department to be used only (i) for 25the management, restoration, and protection of aquatic and 26riparian habitats in Illinois, (ii) for elimination of or   SB1311- 4 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1protection from aquatic nuisance species, and (iii) for 2preparation for and protection from the effects of climate 3change in Illinois, including increased risks of flooding, 4erosion, and sedimentation. 5(Source: P.A. 95-853, eff. 8-18-08; 96-1160, eff. 1-1-11; 696-1518, eff. 2-4-11.) 7    (515 ILCS 5/20-12 new)8    Sec. 20-12. Aquatic habitat conservation stamp. Any 9individual taking or attempting to take any aquatic life 10protected by this Code by any means whatever in the State of 11Illinois shall, in addition to any other license required by 12this Code, first obtain an aquatic habitat conservation stamp 13authorized by the Department. Individuals not required to 14obtain a license are not required to obtain an aquatic habitat 15conservation stamp. 16    (515 ILCS 5/20-20)  (from Ch. 56, par. 20-20)17    Sec. 20-20. Non-resident licenses. Any individuals 16 18years of age or older not residents of the State of Illinois 19shall, before taking or attempting to take any aquatic life 20protected by this Code by any means whatever in the State of 21Illinois, obtain a non-resident license to do so. In addition, 22before taking or attempting to take salmon from Lake Michigan, 23a non-resident 16 years of age or older shall obtain a salmon 24stamp authorized by the Department; , and before taking or   SB1311- 5 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1attempting to take trout from all waters except Lake Michigan, 2a non-resident 16 years of age or older shall obtain an inland 3trout stamp authorized by the Department; and before taking or 4attempting to take any aquatic life protected by this Code by 5any means whatever in the State of Illinois, a non-resident 16 6years of age or older shall obtain an aquatic habitat 7conservation stamp.8(Source: P.A. 87-833; 88-91.) 9    (515 ILCS 5/20-30)  (from Ch. 56, par. 20-30)10    Sec. 20-30. Application; issuance of license. No license 11shall be issued to use sport fishing or trot line devices, or 12any other fishing devices, until application has been made to 13the Department, to any county, city, village, township, or 14incorporated town clerk, or any other person authorized or 15designated by the Department to issue licenses. Each clerk 16designating agents to issue licenses, and salmon stamps, and 17aquatic habitat conservation stamps shall furnish the 18Department, within 10 days following the appointment, the 19names and mailing addresses of the agents. Applications shall 20be executed and sworn to and shall set forth the name and 21description of the applicant and place of residence. No 22license, or salmon stamp, or aquatic habitat conservation 23stamp shall be issued except upon definite proof of identity 24and place of legal residence.25    No clerk shall sell any license, or salmon stamp, or   SB1311- 6 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1aquatic habitat conservation stamp at any place other than 2within the territorial area for which he or she was elected or 3appointed. No duly designated agent is authorized to furnish 4licenses, or salmon stamps, or aquatic habitat conservation 5stamps for issuance by any other business establishment.6(Source: P.A. 89-66, eff. 1-1-96; 90-225, eff. 7-25-97.) 7    (515 ILCS 5/20-45)  (from Ch. 56, par. 20-45)8    Sec. 20-45. License fees for residents. Fees for licenses 9for residents of the State of Illinois shall be as follows:10        (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, for 11    sport fishing devices as defined in Section 10-95 or 12    spearing devices as defined in Section 10-110, the fee is 13    $14.50 for individuals 16 to 64 years old, one-half of the 14    current fishing license fee for individuals age 65 or 15    older, and, commencing with the 2012 license year, 16    one-half of the current fishing license fee for resident 17    veterans of the United States Armed Forces after returning 18    from service abroad or mobilization by the President of 19    the United States as an active duty member of the United 20    States Armed Forces, the Illinois National Guard, or the 21    Reserves of the United States Armed Forces. Veterans must 22    provide to the Department acceptable verification of their 23    service. The Department shall establish by administrative 24    rule the procedure by which such verification of service 25    shall be made to the Department for the purpose of issuing   SB1311- 7 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1    fishing licenses to resident veterans at a reduced fee.2        (a-3) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 3    for sport fishing devices as defined in Section 10-95 or 4    spearing devices as defined in Section 10-110, residents 5    of this State may obtain a 3-year fishing license. The fee 6    for a 3-year fishing license is 3 times the annual fee. For 7    residents age 65 or older, the fee is one half of the fee 8    charged for a 3-year fishing license. For resident 9    veterans of the United States Armed Forces after returning 10    from service abroad or mobilization by the President of 11    the United States, the fee is one-half of the fee charged 12    for a 3-year fishing license. Veterans must provide to the 13    Department, per administrative rule, verification of their 14    service. The Department shall establish what constitutes 15    suitable verification of service for the purpose of 16    issuing 3-year fishing licenses to resident veterans at a 17    reduced fee. 18        (a-5) The fee for all sport fishing licenses shall be 19    $1 for an annual license and 3 times the annual fee for a 20    3-year license for residents over 75 years of age. 21        (b) All residents before using any commercial fishing 22    device shall obtain a commercial fishing license, the fee 23    for which shall be $60 and a resident fishing license, the 24    fee for which is $14.50. Each and every commercial device 25    used shall be licensed by a resident commercial fisherman 26    as follows:  SB1311- 8 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1            (1) For each 100 lineal yards, or fraction 2        thereof, of seine the fee is $18. For each minnow 3        seine, minnow trap, or net for commercial purposes the 4        fee is $20.5            (2) For each device to fish with a 100 hook trot 6        line device, basket trap, hoop net, or dip net the fee 7        is $3.8            (3) When used in the waters of Lake Michigan, for 9        the first 2000 lineal feet, or fraction thereof, of 10        gill net the fee is $10; and for each 1000 additional 11        lineal feet, or fraction thereof, the fee is $10. 12        These fees shall apply to all gill nets in use in the 13        water or on drying reels on the shore.14            (4) For each 100 lineal yards, or fraction 15        thereof, of gill net or trammel net the fee is $18.16        (c) Residents of this State may obtain a sportsmen's 17    combination license that shall entitle the holder to the 18    same non-commercial fishing privileges as residents 19    holding a license as described in subsection (a) of this 20    Section and to the same hunting privileges as residents 21    holding a license to hunt all species as described in 22    Section 3.1 of the Wildlife Code. No sportsmen's 23    combination license shall be issued to any individual who 24    would be ineligible for either the fishing or hunting 25    license separately. The sportsmen's combination license 26    fee shall be $25.50. For residents age 65 or older, the fee   SB1311- 9 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1    is one-half of the fee charged for a sportsmen's 2    combination license. For resident veterans of the United 3    States Armed Forces after returning from service abroad or 4    mobilization by the President of the United States as an 5    active duty member of the United States Armed Forces, the 6    Illinois National Guard, or the Reserves of the United 7    States Armed Forces, the fee, commencing with the 2012 8    license year, is one-half of the fee charged for a 9    sportsmen's combination license. Veterans must provide to 10    the Department acceptable verification of their service. 11    The Department shall establish by administrative rule the 12    procedure by which such verification of service shall be 13    made to the Department for the purpose of issuing 14    sportsmen's combination licenses to resident veterans at a 15    reduced fee.16        (c-5) Residents of this State may obtain a 3-year 17    sportsmen's combination license that shall entitle the 18    holder to the same non-commercial fishing privileges as 19    residents holding a license as described in subsection 20    (a-3) and to the same hunting privileges as residents 21    holding a license to hunt all species as described in 22    Section 3.1 of the Wildlife Code. A 3-year sportsmen's 23    combination license shall not be issued to any individual 24    who would be ineligible for either the fishing or hunting 25    license separately. The 3-year sportsmen's combination 26    license fee shall be 3 times the annual fee. For residents   SB1311- 10 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1    age 65 or older, the fee is one-half of the fee charged for 2    a 3-year sportsmen's combination license. For resident 3    veterans of the United States Armed Forces after returning 4    from service abroad or mobilization by the President of 5    the United States, the fee is one-half of the fee charged 6    for a 3-year sportsmen's combination license. Veterans 7    must provide to the Department, per administrative rule, 8    verification of their service. The Department shall 9    establish what constitutes suitable verification of 10    service for the purpose of issuing 3-year sportsmen's 11    combination licenses to resident veterans at a reduced 12    fee. 13        (d) For 24 hours of fishing by sport fishing devices 14    as defined in Section 10-95 or by spearing devices as 15    defined in Section 10-110 the fee is $5. This license does 16    not exempt the licensee from the requirement for a salmon, 17    or inland trout stamp, or aquatic habitat conservation 18    stamp. The licenses provided for by this subsection are 19    not required for residents of the State of Illinois who 20    have obtained the license provided for in subsection (a) 21    or (a-3) of this Section.22        (e) All residents before using any commercial mussel 23    device shall obtain a commercial mussel license, the fee 24    for which shall be $50.25        (f) Residents of this State, upon establishing 26    residency as required by the Department, may obtain a   SB1311- 11 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1    lifetime hunting or fishing license or lifetime 2    sportsmen's combination license which shall entitle the 3    holder to the same non-commercial fishing privileges as 4    residents holding a license as described in paragraph (a) 5    of this Section and to the same hunting privileges as 6    residents holding a license to hunt all species as 7    described in Section 3.1 of the Wildlife Code. No lifetime 8    sportsmen's combination license shall be issued to or 9    retained by any individual who would be ineligible for 10    either the fishing or hunting license separately, either 11    upon issuance, or in any year a violation would subject an 12    individual to have either or both fishing or hunting 13    privileges rescinded. The lifetime hunting and fishing 14    license fees shall be as follows:15            (1) Lifetime fishing: 30 x the current fishing 16        license fee.17            (2) Lifetime hunting: 30 x the current hunting 18        license fee.19            (3) Lifetime sportsmen's combination license: 30 x 20        the current sportsmen's combination license fee.21    Lifetime licenses shall not be refundable. A $10 fee shall 22be charged for reissuing any lifetime license. The Department 23may establish rules and regulations for the issuance and use 24of lifetime licenses and may suspend or revoke any lifetime 25license issued under this Section for violations of those 26rules or regulations or other provisions under this Code or   SB1311- 12 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1the Wildlife Code, or a violation of the United States Code 2that involves the taking, possessing, killing, harvesting, 3transportation, selling, exporting, or importing any fish or 4aquatic life protected by this Code or the taking, possessing, 5killing, harvesting, transportation, selling, exporting, or 6importing any fauna protected by the Wildlife Code when any 7part of the United States Code violation occurred in Illinois. 8Individuals under 16 years of age who possess a lifetime 9hunting or sportsmen's combination license shall have in their 10possession, while in the field, a certificate of competency as 11required under Section 3.2 of the Wildlife Code. Any lifetime 12license issued under this Section shall not exempt individuals 13from obtaining additional stamps or permits required under the 14provisions of this Code or the Wildlife Code. Individuals 15required to purchase additional stamps shall sign the stamps 16and have them in their possession while fishing or hunting 17with a lifetime license. All fees received from the issuance 18of lifetime licenses shall be deposited in the Fish and 19Wildlife Endowment Fund.20    Except for licenses issued under subsection (e) of this 21Section, all licenses provided for in this Section shall 22expire on March 31 of each year, except that the license 23provided for in subsection (d) of this Section shall expire 24 24hours after the effective date and time listed on the face of 25the license. Licenses issued under subsection (a-3) or (c-5) 26shall expire on March 31 of the 2nd year after the year in   SB1311- 13 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1which the license is issued. 2    The Department shall by administrative rule provide for 3the automatic renewal of a fishing license upon the request of 4the applicant. 5    All individuals required to have and failing to have the 6license provided for in subsection (a), (a-3), or (d) of this 7Section shall be fined according to the provisions of Section 820-35 of this Code.9    All individuals required to have and failing to have the 10licenses provided for in subsections (b) and (e) of this 11Section shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.12    (g) For the purposes of this Section, "acceptable 13verification" means official documentation from the Department 14of Defense or the appropriate Major Command showing 15mobilization dates or service abroad dates, including: (i) a 16DD-214, (ii) a letter from the Illinois Department of Military 17Affairs for members of the Illinois National Guard, (iii) a 18letter from the Regional Reserve Command for members of the 19Armed Forces Reserve, (iv) a letter from the Major Command 20covering Illinois for active duty members, (v) personnel 21records for mobilized State employees, and (vi) any other 22documentation that the Department, by administrative rule, 23deems acceptable to establish dates of mobilization or service 24abroad. 25    For the purposes of this Section, the term "service 26abroad" means active duty service outside of the 50 United   SB1311- 14 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1States and the District of Columbia, and includes all active 2duty service in territories and possessions of the United 3States. 4(Source: P.A. 102-780, eff. 5-13-22; 102-837, eff. 5-13-22; 5103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-456, eff. 1-1-24.) 6    (515 ILCS 5/20-52 new)7    Sec. 20-52. The fee for an aquatic habitat conservation 8stamp shall be $6 for both resident and non-resident 9licensees. The fee for an aquatic habitat conservation stamp 10shall be waived for residents over 75 years of age. Every 11person shall sign the aquatic habitat conservation stamp or 12affix the aquatic habitat conservation stamp to his or her 13license. These stamps shall expire on March 31 of each year. 14All individuals required to have and failing to have an 15aquatic habitat conservation stamp as provided in Section 1620-12 of this Code shall be guilty of a petty offense. 17    (515 ILCS 5/20-55)  (from Ch. 56, par. 20-55)18    Sec. 20-55. License fees for non-residents. Fees for 19licenses for non-residents of the State of Illinois are as 20follows:21    (a) For sport fishing devices as defined by Section 10-95, 22or spearing devices as defined in Section 10-110, 23non-residents age 16 or older shall be charged $31 for a 24fishing license to fish. For sport fishing devices as defined   SB1311- 15 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1by Section 10-95, or spearing devices as defined in Section 210-110, for a period not to exceed 3 consecutive days fishing 3in the State of Illinois the fee is $15.00.4    For sport fishing devices as defined in Section 10-95, or 5spearing devices as defined in Section 10-110, for 24 hours of 6fishing the fee is $10. This license does not exempt the 7licensee from the salmon stamp, or inland trout stamp, or 8aquatic habitat conservation stamp requirement.9    (b) All non-residents before using any commercial fishing 10device shall obtain a non-resident commercial fishing license, 11the fee for which shall be $300, and a non-resident fishing 12license. Each and every commercial device shall be licensed by 13a non-resident commercial fisherman as follows: 14        (1) For each 100 lineal yards, or fraction thereof, of 15    seine (excluding minnow seines) the fee is $36. 16        (2) For each device to fish with a 100 hook trot line 17    device, basket trap, hoop net, or dip net the fee is $6. 18        (3) For each 100 lineal yards, or fraction thereof, of 19    trammel net the fee is $36. 20        (4) For each 100 lineal yards, or fraction thereof, of 21    gill net the fee is $36.22    All persons required to have and failing to have the 23license provided for in subsection (a) of this Section shall 24be fined under Section 20-35 of this Code. Each person 25required to have and failing to have the licenses required 26under subsection (b) of this Section shall be guilty of a Class   SB1311- 16 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1B misdemeanor.2    All licenses provided for in this Section shall expire on 3March 31 of each year; except that the 24-hour license for 4sport fishing devices or spearing devices shall expire 24 5hours after the effective date and time listed on the face of 6the license and licenses for sport fishing devices or spearing 7devices for a period not to exceed 3 consecutive days fishing 8in the State of Illinois as provided in subsection (a) of this 9Section shall expire at midnight on the tenth day after 10issued, not counting the day issued.11(Source: P.A. 99-78, eff. 7-20-15.) 12    (515 ILCS 5/20-110)  (from Ch. 56, par. 20-110)13    Sec. 20-110. Possession of license, permit, or stamp. 14Every person holding any license, salmon stamp, inland trout 15stamp, aquatic habitat conservation stamp, or permit issued 16under this Code shall have it in his or her possession for 17immediate presentation for inspection to the authorized 18employees of the Department, or to any sheriff, deputy 19sheriff, or any other peace officer, making a demand for it 20within his or her jurisdiction. 21(Source: P.A. 87-833; 88-91.) 22    (515 ILCS 5/20-115)  (from Ch. 56, par. 20-115)23    Sec. 20-115. Form of licenses, stamps, and permits. 24Licenses, salmon stamps, inland trout stamps, aquatic habitat   SB1311- 17 -LRB104 07182 BDA 17219 b1conservation stamps, and permits authorized to be issued under 2this Code shall be prepared by the Department and shall be in 3the form prescribed by the Department. In addition, at the 4time of issuance, the information required on each license 5shall be completed on it by the issuing agent or his or her 6sub-agent and each license shall be signed by the licensee, or 7initialed by the designated purchaser and then signed 8immediately upon receipt by the licensee, and counter-signed 9by the issuing agent or his or her sub-agent. All licenses 10shall be supplied by the Department, subject to any rules and 11regulations as the Department may prescribe. Any license not 12properly prepared, obtained, and signed as required by this 13Code shall be void.14(Source: P.A. 90-225, eff. 7-25-97.)